Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3309
Recreational license, defined.

Recreational license means a license, certificate, registration, permit, tag, sticker, or other similar document or identifier evidencing permission to hunt, fish, or trap for furs in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 9.